Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1646
Dams; review and approval required; when.

(1) The Chief Water Officer shall review and approve the design, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of all dams in the state for the protection of life and property as provided in the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act.

(2) No person shall construct, reconstruct, enlarge, alter, breach, remove, or abandon any dam without approval by the Chief Water Officer.

(3) An owner of a dam who has entered into a cooperative agreement with the Chief Water Officer pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of section 46-1663 shall be deemed to be in compliance with the act.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 46;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 284.